Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
329 [OLD]

NARCOTICS

REPEALED. L 1972, c 10, §7.

Note

§§329-14 and 22 are renumbered §§329-39 and 44, respectively,
and assigned to the new chapter 329, Uniform Controlled Substances Act. L
1972, c 10, §§7, 8.

CHAPTER
329

UNIFORM
CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

329-1 Definitions

329-2 Hawaii advisory commission on drug abuse
and

controlled substances; number; appointment

329-3 Annual report

329-4 Duties of the Hawaii advisory commission
on drug

abuse and controlled substances

Part II. Standards and Schedules

329-11 Authority to schedule controlled
substances

329-12 Nomenclature

329-13 Schedule I tests

329-14 Schedule I

329-15 Schedule II tests

329-16 Schedule II

329-17 Schedule III tests

329-18 Schedule III

329-19 Schedule IV tests

329-20 Schedule IV

329-21 Schedule V tests

329-22 Schedule V

329-23 Republishing and distribution of schedules

Part III. Regulation of Manufacture,
Distribution,

Prescription, and Dispensing of
Controlled

Substances

329-31 Rules

329-31.5 Clinics

329-32 Registration requirements

329-33 Registration

329-34 Revocation and suspension of registration

329-35 Order to show cause

329-36 Records of registrants

329-37 Filing requirements

329-38 Prescriptions

329-39 Labels

329-40 Methadone treatment programs

Part IV. Offenses and Penalties

329-41 Prohibited acts B--penalties

329-42 Prohibited acts C--penalties

329-43 Penalties under other laws

329-43.5 Prohibited acts related to drug
paraphernalia

329-43.6 Overdose prevention; limited immunity

329-44 Notice of conviction to be sent to
licensing board,

department of commerce and consumer
affairs

329-45 Repealed

329-46 Prohibited acts related to visits to more
than one

practitioner to obtain controlled
substance

prescriptions

329-49 Administrative penalties

329-50 Injunctive relief

Part V. Enforcement and Administrative
Provisions

329-51 Powers of enforcement personnel

329-52 Administrative inspections

329-53 Injunctions

329-54 Cooperative arrangements and
confidentiality

329-55 Forfeitures

329-56 Burden of proof; liabilities

329-57 Judicial review

329-58 Education and research

329-59 Controlled substance registration
revolving fund;

established

Part VI. Regulated Chemicals for the
Manufacture of

Controlled Substances

329-61 Substances subject to reporting

329-62 Proper identification

329-63 Person required to keep records and file
reports

329-64 Exceptions

329-65 Penalty

329-66 Theft, loss, and discrepancy reports

329-67 Permit for conduct of business;
applications; forms;

fees; renewal; violations

329-68 Protection of records; divulging
confidential

information prohibited; penalties

329-69 Subpoena powers

329-70 Forfeiture

329-71 Requirements when selling specific
chemicals

329-72 Rules

329-73 Pseudoephedrine permit

329-74 Unlawful transport of pseudoephedrine

329-75 Sales of products, mixtures, or
preparations

containing pseudoephedrine; reporting
requirement

for wholesalers

Part VII. Precursors to Controlled
Substances--Repealed

329-81 to 91 Repealed

Part VIII. Electronic Prescription
Accountability

System

329-101 Reporting of dispensation of controlled
substances;

electronic prescription accountability
system;

requirements; penalty

329-102 Central repository

329-103 Designated state agency

329-104 Confidentiality of information; disclosure
of

information

Part IX. Medical Use of Marijuana

329-121 Definitions

329-122 Medical use of marijuana; conditions of
use

329-123 Registration requirements

329-124 Insurance not applicable

329-125 Protections afforded to a qualifying
patient or

primary caregiver

329-125.5 Medical marijuana patient and caregiver
protections

329-125.6 Protections afforded to an owner or
qualified

employee of a licensed medical marijuana
dispensary

329-126 Protections afforded to a treating
physician

329-127 Protection of marijuana and other seized
property

329-128 Fraudulent misrepresentation; penalty

329-129 Prohibited acts; flammable solvents

329-130 Authorized sources of medical marijuana

329-131 Prescription and pharmacy requirements not
applicable

Note

Industrial hemp remediation and biofuel crop research program
(repealed July 1, 2016). L 2014, c 56.

Cross References

Drug dealer liability, see chapter 663E.

Money laundering, see chapter 708A.

Law Journals and Reviews

Regression by Progression: Unleveling the Classroom Playing
Field Through Cosmetic Neurology. 33 UH L. Rev. 193 (2010).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next